Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 1. Department Functions; Memorials and Cemeteries.

Sec. 44.35.010.
Adjutant general.

The principal executive officer of the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs is the adjutant general.

History.

(§ 15 ch 64 SLA 1959; am E.O. No. 58, § 20 (1984))

Collateral references. —

53 Am. Jur. 2d, Military and Civil Defense, §§ 25, 29, 30.

6 C.J.S., Armed Services, §§ 341 to 350.

Sec. 44.35.020.
Duties and powers of department.

The Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs shall

conduct the military affairs of the state as prescribed by AS 26.05;

cooperate with the federal government in matters of mutual concern pertaining to the welfare of Alaska veterans, including establishing, extending, or strengthening services for veterans in the state;

annually, not later than February 1, make available a report to the legislature, through the governor, outlining the department’s activities during the previous calendar year; the department shall notify the legislature that the report is available; and

cooperate with the Department of Public Safety to develop and implement missing vulnerable adult prompt response and notification plans under AS

44.41.060

.

The Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs may administer training and pre-employment training programs.

The Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs may establish and operate the Alaska Military Youth Academy as part of the National Guard Youth Challenge Program established under 32 U.S.C. 509 to assist in intervening in and reclaiming the lives of at-risk youth in the state and to produce graduates of the program with the values, skills, education, and self-discipline necessary to succeed as adults.

History.

(§ 15 ch 64 SLA 1959; am E.O. No. 58, § 21 (1984); am § 12 ch 95 SLA 1989; am § 2 ch 6 SLA 1992; am § 95 ch 21 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 71 SLA 2013; am § 2 ch 72 SLA 2013; am § 8 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For the Military Code of Alaska, see AS 26.05.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2013 amendment, effective October 8, 2013, added (a)(4).

The second 2013 amendment, effective January 1, 2014, added (c).

The 2016 amendment, effective August 7, 2016, in (a)(1), substituted “AS 26.05” for “the military code”; in (a)(2), substituted “Alaska” for “Alaskan”. Although the 2016 amendment was to have taken effect July 1, 2016, under § 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, the governor did not sign the bill until August 6, 2016, and so the actual effective date of the 2016 amendment was August 7, 2016, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Collateral references. —

53 Am. Jur. 2d, Military and Civil Defense, §§ 1 et seq., 17, 19, 21, 23, 25 to 41.

Sec. 44.35.030.
Construction of memorials to Alaska veterans.

The Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs may construct memorials to Alaska veterans.
A memorial constructed under this section is not subject to AS 35.15 or AS 35.27.

History.

(§ 1 ch 30 SLA 1981; am E.O. No. 58, § 22 (1984))

Cross references. —

For maintenance of veterans’ memorials in state parks, see AS

41.21.020(a)(12)

.

Sec. 44.35.035.
Alaska veterans’ cemeteries.

The department may, subject to the requirements of 38 U.S.C. 2408, establish and maintain Alaska veterans’ cemeteries in the state to serve state veterans and spouses and eligible dependents of state veterans.

The department may accept gifts, donations, and grants, including land, under AS

26.10.030

for the purpose of establishing and maintaining Alaska veterans’ cemeteries. Land received by the department for an Alaska veterans’ cemetery shall be owned by the state.

The department shall, in consultation with the Alaska Veterans’ Advisory Council,

receive the plot or interment allowance on behalf of the state under 38 U.S.C. 2303;

comply with all requirements for a state veterans’ cemetery grant established by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs under 38 U.S.C. 2408; and

apply to the United States Department of Veterans Affairs for state veterans’ cemetery grants under 38 U.S.C. 2408.

The department may

adopt regulations necessary to administer Alaska veterans’ cemeteries;

enter into agreements with political subdivisions of the state and other persons for the maintenance and operation of Alaska veterans’ cemeteries; and

solicit gifts, donations, and grants in addition to a state veterans’ cemetery grant in (c) of this section that may be designated for the establishment and maintenance of an Alaska veterans’ cemetery and received by the department under AS

26.10.030

.

In this section, “department” means the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs.

History.

(§ 10 ch 21 SLA 2009)

Sec. 44.35.040.
Fees for certain training.

The Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs may adopt regulations establishing reasonable fees for training provided by the department to persons relating to the transportation, storage, or other management of hazardous substances, and establishing procedures for the collection of the fees.

History.

(§ 59 ch 36 SLA 1990)